myanmar.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+N +Pl +Sub +Obj +V +Realis +Nom +Irrealis
! Lexicon containing lexical stems:
LEXICON Root
ပြော V ;
 သွား V ;
 ဖတ် V ;
 ကြိုက် V ;
 စား V ;
 စီး V ;
 ဖက် V ;
 လုပ် V ;
 ချစ်  V ;
 ပေး  V ;
 ကျွဲ N ;
 တူ N ;
 အိမ် N ;
 စာအုပ် N ;
 ဖုန်း N ;
 သား N ;
 သွား N ;
 ကား N ;
 အိုး N ;
 ပန်းသီး N ;

! Lexicon containing POS tag only:
LEXICON V
+V: V-suff ;

LEXICON N
+N: N-suff ;

! Lexicon containing inflectional suffixes and corresponding tags:
LEXICON V-suff
+Realis+Nom:တာ   # ;
+Realis:တယ်  # ;
+Irrealis:မယ် # ;
+Irrealis+Nom:မှာ    # ;

LEXICON N-suff
+Pl+Sub: များက   # ;
+Sub: က  # ;
+Pl:မျာ  # ;
+Pl+Obj: မျာကို    # ;
+Obj: ကို   # ;



! compile via: $ hfst-lexc myanmar.lexc -o myanmar.hfst
! words to look up using $ echo <word>+suff | hfst-lookup myannoun.hfst : စာအုပ်+N+Pl+Sub ; ကား+N+Pl+Obj ; ပန်းသီး+N+Pl ; အိုး+N+Sub ; ကျွဲ+N+Obj 
! words to look up using $ echo <word>+suff | hfst-lookup myanverb.hfst : ပြော+V+Realis+Nom ပြော+V+Realis ပြော+V+Irrealis+Nom ပြော+V+Irrealis သွား+V+Realis သွား+V+Realis+Nom သွား+V+Irrealis+Nom သွား+V+Irrealis ဖတ်+V+Realis+Nom ဖတ်+V+Realis ဖတ်+V+Irrealis+Nom ဖတ်+V+Irrealis

! $ echo စာအုပ်+N+Pl+Sub | hfst-lookup myanmar.hfst
